Utah statutes.
41-6a-1505.   Motorcycle or motor-driven cycle -- Protective headgear -- Closed cab excepted -- Electric assisted bicycles, motor assisted scooters, electric personal assistive mobility devices.

(1)  A person under the age of 18 may not operate or ride on a motorcycle or motor-driven cycle on a highway unless the person is wearing protective headgear which complies with specifications adopted under Subsection (3).

(2)  This section does not apply to persons riding within an enclosed cab.

(3)  The following standards and specifications for protective headgear are adopted:

(a)  49 C.F.R. 571.218 related to protective headgear for motorcycles; and

(b)  16 C.F.R. Part 1203 related to protective headgear for bicycles, motor assisted scooters, and electric personal assistive mobility devices.

(4)  A court shall waive $8 of a fine charged to a person operating a motorcycle or motor-driven cycle for a moving traffic violation if the person was:

(a)  18 years of age or older at the time of operation; and

(b)  wearing protective headgear that complies with the specifications adopted under Subsection (3) at the time of operation.

(5)  The failure to wear protective headgear:

(a)  does not constitute contributory or comparative negligence on the part of a person seeking recovery for injuries; and

(b)  may not be introduced as evidence in any civil litigation on the issue of negligence, injuries, or the mitigation of damages.

(6)  Notwithstanding Subsection (4), a court may not waive $8 of a fine charged to a person operating a motorcycle or motor-driven cycle for a driving under the influence violation of Section 41-6a-502.

